North Carolina, session 2025, HB76.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 1O.
"Assisted Reproductive Technology.
"§ 90-21.160. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Assisted reproductive technology. – All treatments or procedures that include
the handling of human oocytes or human embryos, including in vitro
fertilization, gamete intrafallopian transfer, and zygote intrafallopian transfer.
(2) Health care provider. – Either of the following:
a. An individual who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized under
this Chapter to provide health care services in the ordinary course of
business or practice of a profession or in an approved education or
training program.
b. A health care facility licensed under Chapter 131E of the General
Statutes to provide health care services to patients.
The term "health care provider" includes (i) an agent or employee of a
health care facility that is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized to
provide health care services, (ii) the officers and directors of a health care
facility, and (iii) an agent or employee of a health care provider who is
licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized to provide health care services.
(3) Health care service. – A health or medical procedure or service rendered by a
health care provider that meets either of the following criteria:
a. Provides testing, diagnosis, or treatment of a health condition, illness,
injury, or disease.
b. Dispenses drugs, medical devices, medical appliances, or medical
goods for the treatment of a health condition, illness, injury, or disease.
"§ 90-21.162. Right to access assisted reproductive technology.
Neither the State nor any of its political subdivisions shall prohibit, unreasonably limit, or
interfere with any of the following:
(1) The right of a patient to access assisted reproductive technology.
*H76-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The right of a health care provider to provide or assist with the provision of
evidence-based information related to assisted reproductive technology.
(3) The right of a health care provider to perform or assist with the performance
of assisted reproductive technology.
"§ 90-21.164. Construction.
Nothing in this Article shall be construed to prohibit the enforcement of health and safety
laws related to the operation of health care facilities or the provision of health care services by
health care providers."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 76-First Edition